Utah statutes.
17-50-405.   County legislative body claim for expenses -- County attorney's
opinion of legality.
(1)  Each claim against the county presented by a member of the county
legislative body for the member's expenses shall:
(a)  be itemized and verified as other claims;
(b)  state that the service has been actually rendered; and
(c)  be presented to the county attorney or, in a county that has a district
attorney but not a county attorney, the district attorney.
(2) (a)  The county or district attorney, as the case may be, shall endorse on
the claim, in writing, the attorney's opinion as to its legality.
(b)  If the attorney declares the claim illegal, the attorney shall state
specifically the reasons why it is illegal, and the county executive shall
reject the claim.
